liblouis-back-translation-tables/ml-in-g3-abk.utb
### Section 4 - Dot-1356 Contractions
sufword \x0D09\x0D2A\x0D2F\x0D4B\x0D17 1356-136
sufword \x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D30\x0D38\x0D3F\x0D26\x0D4D\x0D27 1356-1234
sufword \x0D2E\x0D41\x0D24\x0D32 1356-134
sufword \x0D35\x0D32\x0D3F\x0D2F 1356-1236
sufword \x0D38\x0D3E\x0D27\x0D3E\x0D30\x0D23 1356-234
sufword \x0D2E\x0D41\x0D34\x0D41\x0D35 1356-12356
sufword \x0D05\x0D24\x0D4D\x0D2F\x0D3E\x0D35\x0D36\x0D4D\x0D2F 1356-1
sufword \x0D06\x0D17\x0D4D\x0D30\x0D39 1356-345
sufword \x0D07\x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D2A\x0D4B 1356-24
sufword \x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D30\x0D35\x0D30\x0D4D\x200D\x0D24\x0D4D\x0D24 1356-124
sufword \x0D0E\x0D28\x0D4D\x0D24\x0D46\x0D32\x0D4D\x0D32\x0D3E 1356-26
sufword \x0D0F\x0D24\x0D46\x0D32\x0D4D\x0D32\x0D3E 1356-15
sufword \x0D12\x0D1F\x0D4D\x0D1F 1356-1346
sufword \x0D15\x0D23\x0D4D\x0D1F 1356-13
sufword \x0D17\x0D35\x0D47\x0D37 1356-1245
sufword \x0D06\x0D18\x0D4B\x0D37 1356-126
sufword \x0D1A\x0D46\x0D2F\x0D4D\x0D24 1356-14
sufword \x0D1C\x0D40\x0D35\x0D3F\x0D24 1356-245
sufword \x0D24\x0D40\x0D30\x0D4D\x200D\x0D1A\x0D4D\x0D1A 1356-2345
sufword \x0D2D\x0D30\x0D23 1356-45
sufword \x0D32\x0D2D\x0D3F\x0D15\x0D4D\x0D15 1356-123
sufword \x0D36\x0D15\x0D4D\x0D24 1356-146
sufword \x0D15\x0D41\x0D31\x0D1A\x0D4D\x0D1A 1356-12456
sufword \x0D05\x0D15\x0D4D\x0D37\x0D30 1356-12345
sufword \x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D30\x0D35\x0D30\x0D4D\x200D\x0D24\x0D4D\x0D24 1356-5-1235
sufword \x0D38\x0D4D\x0D25 1356-1356


### Section 5 - 
sufword \x0D28\x0D3F\x0D30\x0D4D\x200D 23

### Section 6 - 
midendword \x0D15\x0D4D\x0D15 5-13
midendword \x0D17\x0D4D\x0D17 5-1245
midendword \x0D19\x0D4D\x0D19 5-346
midendword \x0D1A\x0D4D\x0D1A 5-14
midendword \x0D1C\x0D4D\x0D1C 5-245
midendword \x0D1E\x0D4D\x0D1E 5-25
midendword \x0D1F\x0D4D\x0D1F 5-23456
midendword \x0D21\x0D4D\x0D21 5-1246
midendword \x0D23\x0D4D\x0D23 5-3456
midendword \x0D24\x0D4D\x0D24 5-2345
midendword \x0D26\x0D4D\x0D26 5-145
midendword \x0D28\x0D4D\x0D28 5-1345
midendword \x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D2A 5-1234
midendword \x0D2C\x0D4D\x0D2C 5-12
midendword \x0D2E\x0D4D\x0D2E 5-134
midendword \x0D2F\x0D4D\x0D2F 5-13456
midendword \x0D32\x0D4D\x0D32 5-123
midendword \x0D35\x0D4D\x0D35 5-1236
midendword \x0D36\x0D4D\x0D36 5-146
midendword \x0D38\x0D4D\x0D38 5-234
midendword \x0D33\x0D4D\x0D33 5-456
midendword \x0D31\x0D4D\x0D31 5-12456

# Dot-1 Contractions
midendword \x0D15\x0D4D\x0D15\x0D3E 1-13
midendword \x0D17\x0D4D\x0D17\x0D3E 1-1245
midendword \x0D19\x0D4D\x0D19\x0D3E 1-346
midendword \x0D1A\x0D4D\x0D1A\x0D3E 1-14
midendword \x0D1C\x0D4D\x0D1C\x0D3E 1-245
midendword \x0D1E\x0D4D\x0D1E\x0D3E 1-25
midendword \x0D1F\x0D4D\x0D1F\x0D3E 1-23456
midendword \x0D21\x0D4D\x0D21\x0D3E 1-1246
midendword \x0D23\x0D4D\x0D23\x0D3E 1-3456
midendword \x0D24\x0D4D\x0D24\x0D3E 1-2345
midendword \x0D26\x0D4D\x0D26\x0D3E 1-145
midendword \x0D28\x0D4D\x0D28\x0D3E 1-1345
midendword \x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D2A\x0D3E 1-1234
midendword \x0D2C\x0D4D\x0D2C\x0D3E 1-12
midendword \x0D2E\x0D4D\x0D2E\x0D3E 1-134
midendword \x0D32\x0D4D\x0D32\x0D3E 1-123
midendword \x0D38\x0D4D\x0D38\x0D3E 1-234
midendword \x0D33\x0D4D\x0D33\x0D3E 1-456
midendword \x0D31\x0D4D\x0D31\x0D3E 1-12456
midendword \x0D35\x0D4D\x0D35\x0D3E 1-1236
midendword \x0D2F\x0D4D\x0D2F\x0D3E 1-13456

# Dot-23 Contractions
midendword \x0D15\x0D4D\x0D15\x0D3F 23-13
midendword \x0D17\x0D4D\x0D17\x0D3F 23-1245
midendword \x0D19\x0D4D\x0D19\x0D3F 23-346
midendword \x0D1A\x0D4D\x0D1A\x0D3F 23-14
midendword \x0D1C\x0D4D\x0D1C\x0D3F 23-245
midendword \x0D1E\x0D4D\x0D1E\x0D3F 23-25
midendword \x0D1F\x0D4D\x0D1F\x0D3F 23-23456
midendword \x0D21\x0D4D\x0D21\x0D3F 23-1246
midendword \x0D23\x0D4D\x0D23\x0D3F 23-3456
midendword \x0D24\x0D4D\x0D24\x0D3F 23-2345
midendword \x0D26\x0D4D\x0D26\x0D3F 23-145
midendword \x0D28\x0D4D\x0D28\x0D3F 23-1345
midendword \x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D2A\x0D3F 23-1234
midendword \x0D2C\x0D4D\x0D2C\x0D3F 23-12
midendword \x0D2E\x0D4D\x0D2E\x0D3F 23-134
midendword \x0D32\x0D4D\x0D32\x0D3F 23-123
midendword \x0D38\x0D4D\x0D38\x0D3F 23-234
midendword \x0D33\x0D4D\x0D33\x0D3F 23-456
midendword \x0D31\x0D4D\x0D31\x0D3F 23-12456
midendword \x0D35\x0D4D\x0D35\x0D3F 23-1236
midendword \x0D2F\x0D4D\x0D2F\x0D3F 23-13456

# Dot-25
midendword \x0D15\x0D4D\x0D15\x0D41 25-13
midendword \x0D17\x0D4D\x0D17\x0D41 25-1245
midendword \x0D19\x0D4D\x0D19\x0D41 25-345
midendword \x0D1A\x0D4D\x0D1A\x0D41 25-14
midendword \x0D1C\x0D4D\x0D1C\x0D41 25-245
midendword \x0D1E\x0D4D\x0D1E\x0D41 25-25
midendword \x0D1F\x0D4D\x0D1F\x0D41 25-23456
midendword \x0D21\x0D4D\x0D21\x0D41 25-1246
midendword \x0D23\x0D4D\x0D23\x0D41 25-3456
midendword \x0D24\x0D4D\x0D24\x0D41 25-2345
midendword \x0D26\x0D4D\x0D26\x0D41 25-145
midendword \x0D28\x0D4D\x0D28\x0D41 25-1345
midendword \x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D2A\x0D41 25-1234
midendword \x0D2C\x0D4D\x0D2C\x0D41 25-12
midendword \x0D2E\x0D4D\x0D2E\x0D41 25-134
midendword \x0D32\x0D4D\x0D32\x0D41 25-123
midendword \x0D38\x0D4D\x0D38\x0D41 25-234
midendword \x0D33\x0D4D\x0D33\x0D41 25-456
midendword \x0D31\x0D4D\x0D31\x0D41 25-12456
midendword \x0D35\x0D4D\x0D35\x0D41 25-1236
midendword \x0D2F\x0D4D\x0D2F\x0D41 25-13456

# Dot-2356 Contractions
midendword \x0D15\x0D4D\x0D15\x0D46 2356-13
midendword \x0D17\x0D4D\x0D17\x0D46 2356-1245
midendword \x0D19\x0D4D\x0D19\x0D46 2356-346
midendword \x0D1A\x0D4D\x0D1A\x0D46 2356-14
midendword \x0D1C\x0D4D\x0D1C\x0D46 2356-245
midendword \x0D1E\x0D4D\x0D1E\x0D46 2356-25
midendword \x0D1F\x0D4D\x0D1F\x0D46 2356-23456
midendword \x0D21\x0D4D\x0D21\x0D46 2356-1246
midendword \x0D23\x0D4D\x0D23\x0D46 2356-3456
midendword \x0D24\x0D4D\x0D24\x0D46 2356-2345
midendword \x0D26\x0D4D\x0D26\x0D46 2356-145
midendword \x0D28\x0D4D\x0D28\x0D46 2356-1345
midendword \x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D2A\x0D46 2356-1234
midendword \x0D2C\x0D4D\x0D2C\x0D46 2356-12
midendword \x0D2E\x0D4D\x0D2E\x0D46 2356-134
midendword \x0D32\x0D4D\x0D32\x0D46 2356-123
midendword \x0D38\x0D4D\x0D38\x0D46 2356-234
midendword \x0D33\x0D4D\x0D33\x0D46 2356-456
midendword \x0D31\x0D4D\x0D31\x0D46 2356-12456
midendword \x0D35\x0D4D\x0D35\x0D46 2356-1236
midendword \x0D2F\x0D4D\x0D2F\x0D46 2356-13456

# Dot-236 Contractions
midendword \x0D15\x0D4D\x0D15\x0D4A 236-13
midendword \x0D17\x0D4D\x0D17\x0D4A 236-1245
midendword \x0D19\x0D4D\x0D19\x0D4A 236-346
midendword \x0D1A\x0D4D\x0D1A\x0D4A 236-14
midendword \x0D1C\x0D4D\x0D1C\x0D4A 236-245
midendword \x0D1E\x0D4D\x0D1E\x0D4A 236-25
midendword \x0D1F\x0D4D\x0D1F\x0D4A 236-23456
midendword \x0D21\x0D4D\x0D21\x0D4A 236-1246
midendword \x0D23\x0D4D\x0D23\x0D4A 236-3456
midendword \x0D24\x0D4D\x0D24\x0D4A 236-2345
midendword \x0D26\x0D4D\x0D26\x0D4A 236-145
midendword \x0D28\x0D4D\x0D28\x0D4A 236-1345
midendword \x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D2A\x0D4A 236-1234
midendword \x0D2C\x0D4D\x0D2C\x0D4A 236-12
midendword \x0D2E\x0D4D\x0D2E\x0D4A 236-134
midendword \x0D32\x0D4D\x0D32\x0D4A 236-123
midendword \x0D38\x0D4D\x0D38\x0D4A 236-234
midendword \x0D33\x0D4D\x0D33\x0D4A 236-456
midendword \x0D31\x0D4D\x0D31\x0D4A 236-12456
midendword \x0D35\x0D4D\x0D35\x0D4A 236-1236
midendword \x0D2F\x0D4D\x0D2F\x0D4A 236-13456

### Section 7 - 

# Dot-5 Midendword 
midendword \x0D1E\x0D4D\x0D1A 5-16
always \x0D1C\x0D4D\x0D1E 5-356
midendword \x0D23\x0D4D\x0D1F 5-2456
midendword \x0D15\x0D4D\x0D24 5-46
midendword \x0D32\x0D4D\x200D\x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D2A 5-126
midendword \x0D24\x0D4D\x0D38 5-1456
midendword \x0D26\x0D4D\x0D27 5-2346
midendword \x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D24 5-235
midendword \x0D34\x0D4D\x0D24\x0D4D\x0D24 5-12345


### Section 8 - 

midendword \x0D3F\x0D32\x0D4D\x200D\x0D28\x0D3F\x0D28\x0D4D\x0D28 5-24
midendword \x0D24\x0D3E\x0D2F 5-34

# Removed due to dot-2 is assigned to SA + Chandrakala so no need for combinations
#midendword \x0D38\x0D4D 2-13
#midendword \x0D38\x0D4D\x0D2E 2-134
#midendword \x0D38\x0D4D\x0D28 2-1345
# midendword \x0D28\x0D4D\x0D24 2-2345  deactivated for estha
#midendword \x0D38\x0D4D\x0D2A 2-1234
#midendword \x0D2E\x0D4D\x0D2A 2-35


midendword \x0D37\x0D4D\x0D15 3-13
midendword \x0D37\x0D4D\x0D2E 3-134
midendword \x0D37\x0D4D\x0D1F 3-23456
midendword \x0D37\x0D4D\x0D23 3-46 # OLD : 3456
midendword \x0D37\x0D4D\x0D2A 3-1234



### Section 9 - 

midendword \x0D28\x0D4D\x0D24\x0D4D\x0D30 124-1356
midendword \x0D28\x0D4D\x0D24\x0D4D\x0D30\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-124-1356



# Section 10
# Dot-256 always
always \x0D15\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-13
always \x0D16\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-46
always \x0D17\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-1245
always \x0D18\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-126
always \x0D19\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-346
always \x0D1A\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-14
always \x0D1B\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-16
always \x0D1C\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-245
always \x0D1E\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-25
always \x0D1F\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-23456
always \x0D20\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-2456
always \x0D21\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-1246
always \x0D22\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-123456
always \x0D23\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-3456
always \x0D24\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-2345
always \x0D25\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-1456
always \x0D26\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-145
always \x0D27\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-2346
always \x0D28\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-1345
always \x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-1234
always \x0D2B\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-235
always \x0D2C\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-12
always \x0D2D\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-45
always \x0D2E\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-134
always \x0D30\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-1235
always \x0D32\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-123
always \x0D35\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-1236
always \x0D36\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-146
always \x0D37\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-12346
always \x0D38\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-234
always \x0D39\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-125
always \x0D33\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-456
always \x0D34\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-12356
always \x0D31\x0D4D\x0D2F 256-12456

# Dot-124 always
always \x0D15\x0D4D\x0D30 124-13
always \x0D16\x0D4D\x0D30 124-46
always \x0D17\x0D4D\x0D30 124-1245
always \x0D18\x0D4D\x0D30 124-126
always \x0D19\x0D4D\x0D30 124-346
always \x0D1A\x0D4D\x0D30 124-14
always \x0D1B\x0D4D\x0D30 124-16
always \x0D1C\x0D4D\x0D30 124-245
always \x0D1E\x0D4D\x0D30 124-25
always \x0D1F\x0D4D\x0D30 124-23456
always \x0D20\x0D4D\x0D30 124-2456
always \x0D21\x0D4D\x0D30 124-1246
always \x0D22\x0D4D\x0D30 124-123456
always \x0D23\x0D4D\x0D30 124-3456
always \x0D24\x0D4D\x0D30 124-2345
always \x0D25\x0D4D\x0D30 124-1456
always \x0D26\x0D4D\x0D30 124-145
always \x0D27\x0D4D\x0D30 124-2346
always \x0D28\x0D4D\x0D30 124-1345
always \x0D2A\x0D4D\x0D30 124-1234
always \x0D2B\x0D4D\x0D30 124-235
always \x0D2C\x0D4D\x0D30 124-12
always \x0D2D\x0D4D\x0D30 124-45
always \x0D2E\x0D4D\x0D30 124-134
always \x0D30\x0D4D\x0D30 124-1235
always \x0D32\x0D4D\x0D30 124-123
always \x0D35\x0D4D\x0D30 124-1236
always \x0D36\x0D4D\x0D30 124-146
always \x0D37\x0D4D\x0D30 124-12346
always \x0D38\x0D4D\x0D30 124-234
always \x0D39\x0D4D\x0D30 124-125
always \x0D33\x0D4D\x0D30 124-456
always \x0D34\x0D4D\x0D30 124-12356
always \x0D31\x0D4D\x0D30 124-12456



always \x0D15\x0D43 156-13
always \x0D16\x0D43 156-46
always \x0D17\x0D43 156-1245
always \x0D18\x0D43 156-126
always \x0D19\x0D43 156-346
always \x0D1A\x0D43 156-14
always \x0D1B\x0D43 156-16
always \x0D1C\x0D43 156-245
always \x0D1E\x0D43 156-25
always \x0D1F\x0D43 156-23456
always \x0D20\x0D43 156-2456
always \x0D21\x0D43 156-1246
always \x0D22\x0D43 156-123456
always \x0D23\x0D43 156-3456
always \x0D24\x0D43 156-2345
always \x0D25\x0D43 156-1456
always \x0D26\x0D43 156-145
always \x0D27\x0D43 156-2346
always \x0D28\x0D43 156-1345
always \x0D2A\x0D43 156-1234
always \x0D2B\x0D43 156-235
always \x0D2C\x0D43 156-12
always \x0D2D\x0D43 156-45
always \x0D2E\x0D43 156-134
always \x0D30\x0D43 156-1235
always \x0D32\x0D43 156-123
always \x0D35\x0D43 156-1236
always \x0D36\x0D43 156-146
always \x0D37\x0D43 156-12346
always \x0D38\x0D43 156-234
always \x0D39\x0D43 156-125
always \x0D33\x0D43 156-456
always \x0D34\x0D43 156-12356
always \x0D31\x0D43 156-12456
